ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Jocuri gaelice (GAA) > Fotbal gaelic: Mingi de fotbal gaelic; Mănuși pentru fotbal gaelic; Echipament de protecție pentru fotbal gaelic; Materiale de antrenament pentru fotbal gaelic
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Gal Oyunları (GAA) > Gal Futbolu: Gal Futbol Topları; Gal Futbol eldivenleri; Gal Futbolu Koruyucu Ekipman; Gal Futbol Antrenmanı Ekipmanları
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Gaelic Games (GAA) > Gaelisk fotboll: Bollar för gaelisk fotboll; Handskar för gaelisk fotboll; Skyddsutrustning för gaelisk fotboll; Träningshjälpmedel för gaelisk fotboll
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Gæliske Lege (GAA) > Gælisk fodbold: Gælisk fodbold – bolde; Gælisk fodbold – handsker; Gælisk fodbold – beskyttelsesudstyr; Gælisk fodbold – træningshjælpemidler
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Gelske igre (GAA) > Irski nogomet: Žoge za irski nogometi; Rokavice za irski nogomet; Zaščitna oprema za irski nogomet; Pripomočki za trening irskega nogometa
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Các môn thể thao Gaelic (GAA) > Bóng đá Gaelic: Bóng đá Gaelic; Găng tay bóng đá Gaelic; Trang bị bảo hộ bóng đá Gaelic; Dụng cụ tập luyện bóng đá Gaelic
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Γαελικά παιχνίδια (GAA) > Γαελικό ποδόσφαιρο: Μπάλες γαελικού ποδοσφαίρου; Γάντια γαελικού ποδοσφαίρου; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός γαελικού ποδοσφαίρου; Βοηθήματα προπόνησης για το γαελικό ποδόσφαιρο
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Галски спортове (GAA) > Галски футбол: Топки за галски футбол; Ръкавици за галски футбол; Защитна екипировка за галски футбол; Помощни средства за тренировка по галски футбол
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 盖尔运动 (GAA) > 盖尔足球: 盖尔足球用球; 盖尔足球手套; 盖尔足球护具; 盖尔足球训练辅助用品
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > ゲーリックゲームズ (GAA) > ゲーリックフットボール: ゲーリックフットボールボール; ゲーリックフットボール用グローブ; ゲーリックフットボール用プロテクター; ゲーリックフットボールトレーニング用具
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Gaelic Games (GAA) > Gaelic football: Gaelisch voetbal ballen; Handschoenen voor Gaelic football; Beschermende uitrusting voor Gaelic football; Hulpmiddelen voor training Gaelisch voetbal
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 蓋爾運動（GAA） > 蓋爾式足球: 蓋爾式足球用球; 蓋爾式足球手套; 蓋爾式足球護具; 蓋爾式足球訓練輔具
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Gaelilaiset lajit (GAA) > Gaelilainen jalkapallo: Gaelilaiset jalkapallot; Gaelilaisen jalkapallon hanskat; Gaelilaisen jalkapallon suojavarusteet; Gaelilaisen jalkapallon harjoitteluvälineet
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Giochi gaelici (GAA) > Calcio gaelico: Palloni da calcio gaelico; Guanti da calcio gaelico; Equipaggiamento protettivo per calcio gaelico; Ausili per l'allenamento del calcio gaelico
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Gaelské hry (GAA) > Galský fotbal: Gaelské fotbalové míče; Rukavice pro galský fotbal; Ochranná výstroj pro galský fotbal; Tréninkové pomůcky pro gaelský fotbal
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Írske hry (GAA) > Írske ragby: Lopty na írske ragby; Rukavice na írske ragby; Ochranné vybavenie na írske ragby; Tréningové pomôcky na írske ragby
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Galske igre (GAA) > Gaelski nogomet: Lopte za irski nogomet; Rukavice za gaelski nogomet; Zaštitna oprema za gaelski nogomet; Pomagala za trening irskog nogometa
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Гэльские игры (GAA) > Гэльский футбол: Мячи для гэльского футбола; Перчатки для гэльского футбола; Защитная экипировка для гэльского футбола; Учебные пособия по гэльскому футболу
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Gälische Spiele (GAA) > Gaelic Football: Gaelic-Football-Bälle; Handschuhe für Gaelic Football; Schutzausrüstung für Gaelic Football; Trainingshilfen für Gaelic Football
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Jeux gaéliques (GAA) > Football gaélique: Ballons de football gaélique; Gants de football gaélique; Équipement de protection pour le football gaélique; Accessoires d’entraînement pour le football gaélique
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 게일릭 게임(GAA) > 게일식 축구: 게일식 축구공; 게일식 축구 글러브; 게일식 축구 보호 장비; 게일식 축구 훈련 장비
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Gael játékok (GAA) > Kelta futball: Gael futball-labdák; Keltafutballkesztyűk; Keltafutball-védőfelszerelés; Gael futball-edzéssegédeszközök
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Gaelic Games (GAA) > Gaelic Football: Gaelic Football Balls; Gaelic Football Gloves; Gaelic Football Protective Gear; Gaelic Football Training Aids
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Gæliske leker (GAA) > Gælisk fotball: Baller for gælisk fotball; Hansker for gælisk fotball; Beskyttelsesutstyr for gælisk fotball; Treningshjelpemidler for gælisk fotball
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Gėlų žaidynės (GAA) > Gėlų futbolas: Gėlų futbolo kamuoliai; Gėlų futbolo pirštinės; Gėlų futbolo apsauginės priemonės; Gėlų futbolo treniruočių priemonės
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Jogos Gaélicos (GAA) > Futebol gaélico: Bolas de futebol gaélico; Luvas de futebol gaélico; Equipamento de proteção para futebol gaélico; Acessórios de treinamento para futebol gaélico
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > กีฬาเกลิก (GAA) > ฟุตบอลเกลิก: ลูกฟุตบอลเกลิก; ถุงมือฟุตบอลเกลิก; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันฟุตบอลเกลิก; อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมฟุตบอลเกลิก
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Juegos Gaélicos (GAA) > Fútbol gaélico: Balones de fútbol gaélico; Guantes de fútbol gaélico; Equipo de protección para fútbol gaélico; Material de entrenamiento para el fútbol gaélico
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Gry gaelickie (GAA) > Futbol gaelicki: Piłki do futbolu gaelickiego; Rękawice do futbolu gaelickiego; Ochraniacze do futbolu gaelickiego; Pomoce treningowe do futbolu gaelickiego
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Jogos Gaélicos (GAA) > Futebol gaélico: Bolas de futebol gaélico; Luvas de futebol gaélico; Equipamento de proteção para futebol gaélico; Auxiliares de treino para futebol gaélico